Alabama, session 2026rs, SB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
PART I.
Section 127 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, is
amended to read as follows:
"Section 127
(a) In case of the governor's removal from office,
death or resignationIf a vacancy occurs in the office of the
governor, the lieutenant governor shall become governor.
(b) If both a vacancy occurs in the office of the
governor and the office of the lieutenant governor be removed
from office, die or resign more than sixty60 days prior to the
next general election, at which any state officers are to be
elected, a governor and lieutenant governor shall be elected
at such election for the unexpired term., and in the event of
Page 1

at such election for the unexpired term., and in the event of
SB271 Enrolled
a vacancy in the office, caused by the removal from office,
death or resignation of the governor and lieutenant governor,
pendingDuring such vacancy and until their successors shall be
elected and qualified, the office of governor shall be held
and administered by either the president pro tem.tempore of
the senate, speaker of the house of representatives,
attorney-general, state auditor, secretary of state, or state
treasurer in the order herein named.
(c) In case of the impeachment of the governor, his or
her absence from the state for more than twenty days,
unsoundness of mind, or other disabilityor incapacity to
serve, the power and authority of the office shall, until the
governor is acquitted, returns to the state, or is restored to
his mind, or relieved from other disabilityno longer
incapacitated, shall devolve in the order herein
named,described in subsection (b) upon the lieutenant
governor, president pro tem.tempore of the senate, speaker of
the house of representatives, attorney-general, state auditor,
secretary of state, and state treasurer. If any of these
officers be are under any of the disabilities herein
specified, the office of the governor shall be administered in
the order named by such of these officers as may be are free
from such disability.
(d) If the governor shall be is absent from the state
over twenty days, the secretary of state shall notify the
lieutenant governor, who shall enter upon the duties of
governor; if both the governor and lieutenant governor shall
be are absent from the state over twenty days, the secretary
Page 2

be are absent from the state over twenty days, the secretary
SB271 Enrolled
of state shall notify the president pro tem.tempore of the
senate, who shall enter upon the duties of governor, and so
on, in case of such absence, he or she shall notify each of
the other officers named in their the order of succession
herein provided, who shall discharge the duties of the office
until the governor or other officer entitled to administer the
office in succession to the governor returns.
(e) If the governor-elect fail or refuse from any cause
to qualify, the lieutenant governor-elect shall qualify and
exercise the duties of governor until the governor-elect
qualifies.; and in the event both If both the governor-elect
and the lieutenant governor-elect from any cause for any
reason fail to qualify, the president pro tem. tempore of the
senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the
attorney-general, state auditor, secretary of state, and state
treasurer, shall, in like manner, in the order named,
administer the office until the governor-elect or lieutenant
governor-elect qualifies.
(f) If a vacancy occurs in the office of the lieutenant
governor more than 60 days before the next general election at
which any state officers are to be elected, a lieutenant
governor shall be elected at such general election for the
unexpired term."
PART II.
The following provision is added to the Constitution of
Alabama of 2022 to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of the
constitution:
Page 3

constitution:
SB271 Enrolled
(1) The Lieutenant Governor and officers of both houses
of the Legislature shall be paid an amount set by joint
resolution; and
(2) Any expenditure of funds appropriated for use by
members of the Legislature for travel shall be approved by an
officer of the Legislature elected from the full membership of
the respective chamber.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution, which may include inserting a
provision into an existing section, omitting this
instructional paragraph and may make the following
nonsubstantive revisions: change capitalization, hierarchy,
spelling, and punctuation for purposes of style and
uniformity; correct manifest grammatical, clerical, and
100 typographical errors; revise internal or external citations
101 and cross-references; harmonize language; and translate
102 effective dates.
103 END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
104 Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
105 shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
106 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
107 state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
108 number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
109 election ballot and shall set forth the following description
110 of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
111 constitutional amendment:
112 "Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
Page 4

"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
SB271 Enrolled
113 of 2022, to provide for the election of a Lieutenant Governor
114 if the Office of Lieutenant Governor becomes vacant during the
115 first two years of a term, to authorize the Legislature to set
116 the salary of the Lieutenant Governor and officers of the
117 Legislature, and to require any expenditure of legislative
118 funds for travel to be approved by a legislative officer.
119 Proposed by Act ____."
120 This description shall be followed by the following
121 language:
122 "Yes( ) No( )."
123 Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
124 a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
125 by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 5

by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
SB271 Enrolled
126
127
128
129
130
131
132 ________________________________________________
133 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
134
135
136
137 ________________________________________________
138 Speaker of the House of Representatives
139
140
141 SB271
142 Senate 19-Feb-26
143 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
144 the Senate, as amended.
145
146 Patrick Harris,
147 Secretary.
148
149
150
151
152 House of Representatives
153 Amended and passed: 31-Mar-26
154
155
156
157
158 Senate concurred in House amendment 01-Apr-26
159
160
161
162
163 By: Senator Givhan
Page 6